Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20133-331
Acquisition of
property interest; purchase; grant; condemnation; procedure.

In any case in which (1) it is desired to remove, lower, or otherwise
terminate a nonconforming structure or use, (2) the approach protection necessary
cannot, because of constitutional limitations, be provided by airport zoning
regulations under the
Airport Zoning Act, or (3) it appears advisable that the necessary
approach protection be provided by acquisition of property rights rather than
by airport zoning regulations, the political subdivision within which the
property or nonconforming use is located or the political subdivision owning or operating the airport or
served by it may acquire by purchase, grant, or condemnation, such air right,
aviation easement, or other estate or interest in the property or nonconforming
structure or use in question as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes
of the act. The procedure to
condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704
to 76-724.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 13, p. 691;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 30, p. 460;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 20.
September 6, 2013